California statutes. Business and Professions Code
 prospective tenant if the information supplied meets the contract specifications with reference to: (i) type of structure; (ii) designated area; (iii) furnished or unfurnished; (iv) number of bedrooms; (v) maximum rental; and (vi) any other specification expressly set forth in the contract. A demand for the return of the fee shall be made by or on behalf of the prospective tenant within 10 days following the expiration of the five-day period referred to above by delivery or by mailing by registered or certified mail to the address of a location, or branch office of a real estate broker, set forth in the contract.

(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (3), a licensee shall refund any fee paid over and above the sum of a fifty dollar ($50) service charge to the prospective tenant if the prospective tenant obtains a rental other than through the services of the licensee during the term of the contract or does not obtain a
 rental, provided that the prospective tenant demands a return of that part of the fee within 10 days after the expiration of the contract.

(2) The licensee shall refund any fee paid over and above the sum of a fifty dollar ($50) service charge to the prospective tenant within 10 days of receipt from the prospective tenant of either the documentation specified in subparagraph (A) or the written statement specified in subparagraph (B), as applicable:

(A) Except as specified in subparagraph (B), a prospective tenant demanding a refund shall provide to the licensee reasonable documentation of the prospective tenant’s new rental or of the fact that the prospective tenant did not move, such as a lease, rental agreement, or utility bill, with sufficient information to verify that the new rental was not obtained through the services of the licensee or that the prospective tenant did not
 move.

(B) If the prospective tenant is unable to locate or provide the documentation specified in subparagraph (A), the prospective tenant may, at his or her option, fill out and sign a written statement, supplied by the licensee, in the following form:I, (name of prospective tenant) , do swear or affirm the following:I currently live at (street address).The following statement is true (check one):_____ I have rented a unit at the above address. I did not obtainthis rental through the services of (name of licensee)during the time of our contract._____ I did not find a new rental and did not move. I still live at the above address.I declare under penalty of perjury that the foregoing is true and correct to the
 best of my knowledge.(date)(location)(signature)(3) On or after January 1, 2002, the
 department may, from time to time, by regulation, adjust the amount of the allowable service charge to reflect the rate of inflation from the previous date that the amount of the allowable service charge was established, as measured by the Consumer Price Index or other method of measuring the rate of inflation which the department determines is reliable and generally accepted.

(c) Each contract shall contain provisions that shall read as follows unless different language shall have been approved in writing by the department prior to use: 
“RIGHT TO REFUND
(Full capital letters, in 12-point type or greater, boldface or italicized)
If, within five days after payment of a fee, the licensee has not supplied the prospective tenant with at least three available rental
 properties meeting the specifications of the contract as to (i) type of structure; (ii) designated area; (iii) furnished or unfurnished; (iv) number of bedrooms; (v) maximum rental; and (vi) any other specification expressly set forth in the contract, the full amount of the fee paid shall be refunded to the prospective tenant upon presentation of evidence of that failure within 10 days after the expiration of the five-day period. The prospective tenant is not entitled to a refund if the prospective tenant obtains a rental through the services of the licensee.

If the prospective tenant obtains a rental other than through the services of the licensee during the term of this contract or if the prospective tenant does not obtain a rental through the services of the licensee during the term of the contract, the licensee shall refund the fee received in excess of a (insert applicable limit pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 10167.10 of the Business and Professions
 Code) service charge to the prospective tenant within 10 days after the prospective tenant supplies either (i) reasonable documentation of the prospective tenant’s new rental or of the fact that the prospective tenant did not move, such as a lease, rental agreement, or utility bill, with sufficient information to verify that the new rental was not obtained through the services of the licensee or that the prospective tenant did not move, or (ii) if the prospective tenant is unable to locate or provide that documentation, the prospective tenant may, at his or her option, fill out a written form provided by the licensee and signed by the prospective tenant under penalty of perjury stating that he or she did not obtain a rental through the services of the licensee during the time of the contract.

To be entitled to a refund in excess of the service charge, the prospective tenant must mail or deliver the demand for refund not later than 10 days after expiration of this
 contract, and must supply either (i) reasonable documentation of the prospective tenant’s new rental or of the fact that the prospective tenant did not move, such as a lease, rental agreement, or utility bill, with sufficient information to verify that the new rental was not obtained through the services of the licensee or that the prospective tenant did not move, or (ii) a written form provided by the licensee and signed by the prospective tenant under penalty of perjury stating that he or she did not obtain a rental through the services of the licensee during the time of the contract. The documentation may be supplied after the demand for a refund is mailed or delivered, provided that it is supplied within a reasonable time after it becomes available.”

(d) This section shall not apply to a person purchasing rental information for a purpose other than that of locating a rental unit for personal use or the use of a designated person.

(e) If the licensee fails to make a refund as provided in this section and if the denial or delay in making the refund is found to have been done in bad faith, a court of appropriate jurisdiction, including a small claims court, shall be empowered to award damages to the plaintiff in an amount not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) in addition to actual damages sustained by the plaintiff. If the licensee refuses or is unable to pay the damages awarded by the court, the award may be satisfied out of the security required under Section 10167.7.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 473, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

10167.11.

It shall be a violation of this article for any licensee or any employee or agent of a licensee to do the following:

(a) Make, or cause to be made, any false, misleading, or deceptive advertisements or representations concerning the services that the licensee will provide to prospective tenants.

(b) Refer a property to a prospective tenant knowing or having reason to know that:

(1) The property does not exist or is unavailable for tenancy.

(2) The property has been described or advertised by or on behalf of the licensee in a false, misleading, or deceptive manner.

(3) The licensee has not confirmed the availability of the property for tenancy during the four-day period immediately preceding dissemination of the listing information. However, it shall not be a violation to refer a property to a prospective tenant during a period of from five to seven days after the most recent confirmation of the availability of the property for rental if the licensee has made a good faith effort to confirm availability within the stated four-day period, and if the most recent date of confirmation of availability is set forth in the referral.

(4) The
 licensee has not obtained written or oral permission to list the property from the property owner, manager, or other authorized agent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 473, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

10167.12.

(a) The commissioner may suspend, deny, or revoke the license of a licensee or the license of the licensee to operate at one or more locations for either of the following:

(1) A violation of this article by a licensee or by an employee or agent, including a designated agent, of the licensee.

(2) A conviction of a licensee, or a designated agent, or of an officer, director, or owner of 25 percent or more of the
 shares of a corporate licensee for a crime which is substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of a prepaid rental listing service licensee.

(b) For the purpose of determining whether grounds exist for suspending, denying, or revoking the license of a licensee, the commissioner shall hold a hearing in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 473, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

10167.13.

A prepaid rental listing service license issued by the department shall be for a period of two years. An application and fee for renewal filed with the department before midnight of the last day of the period for which a previous license was issued entitles the licensee to continue operating at all locations specified in the previous license for which a renewal fee is paid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1051, Sec. 2.   Effective September 26, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

10167.14.

Whenever any person has engaged or threatens to engage in any acts or practices which constitute, or will constitute a violation of a provision of the article, the superior court of the county in which the acts or practices have taken place, or are about to take place, on complaint of the commissioner, the attorney general, district attorney, or city attorney, may enjoin such acts or practices by appropriate order. The proceedings under this section shall be governed by Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 525) of Title 7 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure, except that no undertaking shall be required.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1051, Sec. 2.   Effective September 26, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

10167.15.

Any person, including an officer, director, or employee of a corporation who willfully violates any provision of this article is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1051, Sec. 2.   Effective September 26, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

10167.16.

A person or corporation licensed pursuant to this article and not engaging in acts for which a real estate license is required under Article 1 (commencing with Section 10130) of Chapter 3 of Part 1 of Division 4, shall be subject, in addition to the provisions of this article, to the provisions of Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 10000) and Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 10050) of Part 1 of Division 4, and to Sections 10450, 10452, 10453, and 10454.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1051, Sec. 2.   Effective September 26, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

10167.17.

The commissioner shall, by regulation, make prepaid rental listing service licensees and applicants for prepaid rental listing service licenses subject to the same provisions respecting licensure as are applicable to real estate licenses under Sections 10151.5, 10156.5, 10156.6, 10156.7, 10200, and 10201.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1031, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.5. Continuing Education [10170. - 10171.5.]

10170.

The Legislature has determined that it is in the public interest of consumer protection and consumer service that all real estate licensees licensed under the provisions of this part comply with continuing education requirements adopted by the commissioner pursuant to this article as a prerequisite to the renewal of real estate licenses on and after January 1, 1981.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1346.)
-------------------------------------------

10170.2.

The commissioner may appoint a committee comprised of licensees under this part and persons with expertise in real estate education to advise him with respect to his responsibilities under this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1346.)
-------------------------------------------

10170.4.

The commissioner shall adopt regulations pursuant to Section 10080, to prescribe all of the following:

(a) A definition of basic requirements for continuing education of 45 clock hours of attendance at approved educational courses, seminars, workshops, or conferences, or their equivalent, achieved during a four-year period preceding license renewal application.

(b) A basis and method of qualifying educational programs, the successful completion of which, will satisfy the requirements of this article.

(c) A procedure for evaluation of petitions based on a claim of equivalency with the requirements of subdivision (a), and a reasonable standard by which an activity would be judged equivalent, including, but not limited to, instruction in real estate subjects, publication of professional articles or books, or development of real estate educational programs, law or research.

(d) A system of control and reporting qualifying attendance.

(e) An appropriate form of testing, examination or evaluation by the sponsor of each approved correspondence or homestudy educational program, or equivalent, of the student.

(f) A statement of the conditions of exemption from the continuing education requirements established under this article, as well as a method of applying and qualifying for these exemptions, for reasons of health, military service, or other compelling cause.

In exercising the authority under this article, the commissioner shall establish standards which will assure reasonable currency of knowledge as a basis for a level of real estate practice which will provide a high level of consumer protection and of competence in achieving the objectives of members of the public who engage the services of licensees. The standards shall permit a variety of alternatives of subject material to licensees taking cognizance of specialized areas of practice, and alternatives in sources of programs considering availability in area and time. The standards shall include, where qualified, generally accredited educational institutions, private vocational schools, correspondence institutions, educational programs, workshops, and seminars of professional societies and organizations, other organized educational programs on technical subjects, or equivalent offerings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 232, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

10170.5.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in Section 10170.8, a real estate license shall not be renewed unless the commissioner finds that the applicant for license renewal has, during the four-year period preceding the renewal application, successfully completed the 45 clock hours of education provided for in Section 10170.4, including all of the following:

(1) A three-hour course in ethics, professional conduct, and legal aspects of real estate, which shall include, but not be limited to, relevant legislation, regulations, articles, reports, studies, court decisions, treatises, and information of current interest.

(2) A three-hour
 course in agency relationships and duties in a real estate brokerage practice, including instruction in the disclosures to be made and the confidences to be kept in the various agency relationships between licensees and the parties to real estate transactions.

(3) A three-hour course in trust fund accounting and handling.

(4) A three-hour course in fair housing that shall include an interactive participatory component, during which the applicant shall roleplay as both a consumer and real estate professional.

(5) A three-hour course in risk management that shall include, but need not be limited to, principles, practices, and procedures calculated to avoid errors and omissions in the practice of real estate licensed
 activities.

(6) A two-hour course in implicit bias training that shall include both of the following:

(A) A component regarding the impact of implicit bias, explicit bias, and systemic bias on consumers and the historical and social impacts of those biases.

(B) Actionable steps licensees can take to recognize and address their own implicit biases.

(7) In addition to paragraphs (1) to (6), inclusive, a broker shall complete a three-hour course in the management of real estate offices and supervision of real estate licensed activities that shall include, but need not be limited to, the requirements described in subdivision (a) of Section 10159.7 and Section
 10164.

(8) Not less than 18 clock hours of courses or programs related to consumer protection, and designated by the commissioner as satisfying this purpose in the commissioner’s approval of the offering of these courses or programs, which shall include, but not be limited to, forms of real estate financing relevant to serving consumers in the marketplace, land use regulation and control, pertinent consumer disclosures, agency relationships, capital formation for real estate development, fair practices in real estate, appraisal and valuation techniques, landlord-tenant relationships, energy conservation, environmental regulation and consideration, taxation as it relates to consumer decisions in real estate transactions, probate and similar disposition of real property, governmental programs such as revenue bond activities, redevelopment,
 and related programs, business opportunities, mineral, oil, and gas conveyancing, and California law that relates to managing community associations that own, operate, and maintain property within common interest developments, including, but not limited to, management, maintenance, and financial matters addressed in the Davis-Stirling Common Interest Development Act (Part 5 (commencing with Section 4000) of Division 4 of the Civil Code).

(9) Other courses and programs that will enable a licensee to achieve a high level of competence in serving the objectives of consumers who may engage the services of licensees to secure the transfer, financing, or similar objectives with respect to real property, including organizational and management techniques, including relevant information to assist a salesperson or broker in understanding how
 to be effectively supervised by a responsible broker or branch manager, that will significantly contribute to this goal.

(b) Except as otherwise provided in Section 10170.8, a real estate license shall not be renewed for a licensee who already has renewed under subdivision (a), unless the commissioner finds that the applicant for license renewal has, during the four-year period preceding the renewal application, successfully completed the 45 clock hours of education provided for in Section 10170.4, including a nine-hour update survey course that covers the subject areas specified in paragraphs (1) to (7), inclusive, of subdivision (a).

(c) Any denial of a license pursuant to this section shall be subject to Section 10100.

(d) For purposes of this section, “successful completion” of a course described in paragraphs (1) to (7), inclusive, of subdivision (a) means the passing of a final examination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 786, Sec. 24.   (SB 774)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

10170.6.

The commissioner may amend or repeal any regulation adopted pursuant to this article in the same manner as provided for adoption of such regulations, except that no amendment or repeal shall operate to deprive any licensee of the right to submit qualifying education completed pursuant to such amended or repealed regulation during his current license term, as a basis for license renewal.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1346.)
-------------------------------------------

10170.8.

(a) This article shall not apply to a real estate licensee who submits proof satisfactory to the commissioner that the real estate licensee has been a real estate licensee in good standing for 30 continuous years in this state and is 70 years of age or older.

(b) A “real estate licensee in good standing” is one who holds an active license that has not been suspended, revoked, or restricted as a result of disciplinary action, who has not surrendered a license while under investigation or while subject to a disciplinary action, or received an order of debarment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 431, Sec. 17.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

10171.2.

If an applicant for a license has submitted, in good faith, evidence of completion of continuing education which he had reason to believe would qualify him for license renewal, but the commissioner finds that the evidence submitted does not qualify under standards adopted pursuant to this article, the commissioner may, nonetheless, extend the license for 90 days in order to allow the applicant to submit additional evidence of compliance, which satisfies the requirements of this article. When the license is issued during or at the end of the grace period provided for in this section it shall expire four years from the date otherwise applicable if no grace period had been granted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 373.)
-------------------------------------------

10171.3.

On and after January 1, 1981, a real estate license, which has been revoked as the result of disciplinary action by the commissioner, shall not be reinstated, nor shall a restricted real estate license be issued to an applicant in connection with a petition for reinstatement, unless the applicant presents evidence of completion of the continuing education required by this article. This requirement of evidence of continuing education shall not be imposed upon an applicant for reinstatement who has been required under Section 10182 to pass a qualifying examination as a condition to reinstatement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 144, Sec. 18.)
-------------------------------------------

10171.4.

Any licensee who applies for renewal of his or her license under Section 10461, or for reinstatement of his or her license under Section 10161.5 or 10463, shall, if the previous active license issued to him or her was issued four or more years prior to his or her application for renewal or reinstatement, present evidence of compliance with this article. If no such qualifying evidence is presented, the commissioner may issue a temporary license for a period of 90 days.

If the applicant presents evidence within 90 days of compliance with this article and is otherwise qualified, the commissioner shall issue a regular license without additional fee. It shall expire four years from the date which would otherwise have been applicable if a temporary license under this section had not been issued.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 328, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

10171.5.

A person who is licensed as a real estate broker only as an officer of a corporate broker pursuant to Section 10158 or 10211 shall not be eligible for the renewal of such license nor for the issuance of a license in an individual capacity or as an officer of a corporate broker licensed pursuant to Section 10158 or 10211, unless and until such person has completed the continuing education requirements of this article.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 10171.1 (as added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 263) by Stats. 1983, Ch. 413, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Disciplinary Action [10175. - 10186.9.]

10175.

Upon grounds provided in this article and the other articles of this chapter, the license of any real estate licensee may be revoked or suspended in accordance with the provisions of this part relating to hearings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 127.)
-------------------------------------------

10175.2.

(a) If the Real Estate Commissioner determines that the public interest and public welfare will be adequately served by permitting a real estate licensee to pay a monetary penalty to the department in lieu of an actual license suspension, the commissioner may, on the petition of the licensee, stay the execution of all or some part of the suspension on the condition that the licensee pay a monetary penalty and the further condition that the licensee incur no other cause for disciplinary action within a period of time specified by the commissioner.

(b) The commissioner may exercise the discretion granted under subdivision (a) either with respect to a suspension ordered by a decision
 after a contested hearing on an accusation against the licensee or by stipulation with the licensee after the filing of an accusation, but prior to the rendering of a decision based upon the accusation. In either case, the terms and conditions of the disciplinary action against the licensee shall be made part of a formal decision of the commissioner.

(c) If a licensee fails to pay the monetary penalty in accordance with the terms and conditions of the decision of the commissioner, the commissioner may, without a hearing, order the immediate execution of all or any part of the stayed suspension in which event the licensee shall not be entitled to any repayment nor credit, prorated or otherwise, for money paid to the department under the terms of the decision.

(d) The amount of the monetary penalty payable under this section shall not exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250) for each
 day of suspension stayed nor a total of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per decision regardless of the number of days of suspension stayed under the decision.

(e) Any monetary penalty received by the department pursuant to this section shall be credited to the Consumer Recovery Account of the Real Estate Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 712, Sec. 9.   (SB 706)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

10176.

The commissioner may, upon his or her own motion, and shall, upon the verified complaint in writing of any person, investigate the actions of any person engaged in the business or acting in the capacity of a real estate licensee within this state, and he or she may temporarily suspend or permanently revoke a real estate license at any time where the licensee, while a real estate licensee, in performing or attempting to perform any of the acts within the scope of this chapter has been guilty of any of the following:

(a) Making any substantial misrepresentation.

(b) Making any false promises of a character likely to influence, persuade, or induce.

(c) A
 continued and flagrant course of misrepresentation or making of false promises through licensees.

(d) Acting for more than one party in a transaction without the knowledge or consent of all parties thereto.

(e) Commingling with his or her own money or property the money or other property of others which is received and held by him or her.

(f) Claiming, demanding, or receiving a fee, compensation, or commission under any exclusive agreement authorizing a licensee to perform any acts set forth in Section 10131 for compensation or commission where the agreement does not contain a definite, specified date of final and complete termination.

(g) The claiming or taking by a licensee of any secret or undisclosed amount of compensation, commission, or profit or
 the failure of a licensee to reveal to the buyer or seller contracting with the licensee the full amount of the licensee’s compensation, commission, or profit under any agreement authorizing the licensee to do any acts for which a license is required under this chapter for compensation or commission prior to or coincident with the signing of an agreement evidencing the meeting of the minds of the contracting parties, regardless of the form of the agreement, whether evidenced by documents in an escrow or by any other or different procedure.

(h) The use by a licensee of any provision, which allows the licensee an option to purchase, in an agreement with a buyer or seller that authorizes the licensee to sell, buy, or exchange real estate or a business opportunity for compensation or commission, except when the licensee, prior to or coincident with election to exercise the option to purchase, reveals in writing to the buyer or seller the full
 amount of the licensee’s profit and obtains the written consent of the buyer or seller approving the amount of the profit.

(i) Any other conduct, whether of the same or of a different character than specified in this section, which constitutes fraud or dishonest dealing.

(j) Obtaining the signature of a prospective buyer to an agreement which provides that the prospective buyer shall either transact the purchasing, leasing, renting, or exchanging of a business opportunity property through the broker obtaining the signature, or pay a compensation to the broker if the property is purchased, leased, rented, or exchanged without the broker first having obtained the written authorization of the owner of the property concerned to offer the property for sale, lease, exchange, or rent.

(k) Failing to disburse funds in
 accordance with a commitment to make a mortgage loan that is accepted by the applicant when the real estate broker represents to the applicant that the broker is either of the following:

(1) The lender.

(2) Authorized to issue the commitment on behalf of the lender or lenders in the mortgage loan transaction.

(l) Intentionally delaying the closing of a mortgage loan for the sole purpose of increasing interest, costs, fees, or charges payable by the borrower.

(m) Violating any section, division, or article of law which provides that a violation of that section, division, or article of law by a licensed person is a violation of that person’s licensing law, if it occurs within the scope of that person’s duties as a
 licensee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 285, Sec. 44.   (AB 2884)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10176.1.

(a) (1) Whenever the commissioner takes any enforcement or disciplinary action against a licensee, and the enforcement or disciplinary action is related to escrow services provided pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 17006 of the Financial Code, upon the action becoming final the commissioner shall notify the Insurance Commissioner and the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation of the action or actions taken. The purpose of this notification is to alert the departments that enforcement or disciplinary action has been taken, if the licensee seeks or obtains employment with entities regulated by the departments.

(2) The
 commissioner shall provide the Insurance Commissioner and the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation, in addition to the notification of the action taken, with a copy of the written accusation, statement of issues, or order issued or filed in the matter and, at the request of the Insurance Commissioner or the Commissioner of
 Financial Protection and Innovation, with any underlying factual material relevant to the enforcement or disciplinary action. Any confidential information provided by the commissioner to the Insurance Commissioner or the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation shall not be made public pursuant to this section. Notwithstanding any other law, the disclosure of any underlying factual material to the Insurance Commissioner or the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation shall not operate as a waiver of confidentiality or any privilege that the commissioner may assert.

(b) The commissioner shall establish and
 maintain, on the
 internet website maintained by the Department of Real Estate, a database of its licensees, including those who have been subject to any enforcement or disciplinary action that triggers the notification requirements of this section. The database shall also contain a direct link to the databases, described in Section 17423.1 of the Financial Code and Section 12414.31 of the Insurance Code and required to be maintained on the internet websites of the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation and the Department of Insurance, respectively, of persons who have been subject to enforcement or disciplinary action for malfeasance or misconduct related to the escrow industry by the Insurance Commissioner and the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation.

(c) There shall be no liability on the part of, and no cause of action
 of any nature shall arise against, the State of California, the Department of Real Estate, the Real Estate Commissioner, any other state agency, or any officer, agent, employee, consultant, or contractor of the state, for the release of any false or unauthorized information pursuant to this section, unless the release of that information was done with knowledge and malice, or for the failure to release any information pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 431, Sec. 18.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

10176.5.

(a) The commissioner may, upon his or her own motion, and shall upon receiving a verified complaint in writing from any person, investigate an alleged violation of Article 1.5 (commencing with Section 1102) of Chapter 2 of Title 4 of Part 4 of Division 2 of the Civil Code by any real estate licensee within this state. The commissioner may suspend or revoke a licensee’s license if the licensee acting under the license has willfully or repeatedly violated any of the provisions of Article 1.5 (commencing with Section 1102) of Chapter 2 of Title 4 of Part 4 of Division 2 of the Civil Code.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of Article 1.5 (commencing with Section 1102) of Chapter 2 of Title 4 of Part 4 of Division 2 of the Civil Code, and in lieu of any other civil remedy, subdivision (a) of this section is the only remedy available for violations of Section 1102.6b of the Civil Code by any real estate licensee within this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 772, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

10177.

The commissioner may suspend or revoke the license of a real estate licensee, delay the renewal of a license of a real estate licensee, or deny the issuance of a license to an applicant, who has done any of the following, or may suspend or revoke the license of a corporation, delay the renewal of a license of a corporation, or deny the issuance of a license to a corporation, if an officer, director, or person owning or controlling 10 percent or more of the corporation’s stock has done any of the following:

(a) Procured, or attempted to procure, a real estate license or license renewal, for themself or a salesperson, by fraud, misrepresentation, or deceit, or by making a material misstatement of fact in
 an application for a real estate license, license renewal, or reinstatement.

(b) (1) Entered a plea of guilty or no contest to, or been found guilty of, or been convicted of, a felony, or a crime substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of a real estate licensee, and the time for appeal has elapsed or the judgment of conviction has been affirmed on appeal, irrespective of an order granting probation following that conviction, suspending the imposition of sentence, or of a subsequent order under Section 1203.4 of the Penal Code allowing that licensee to withdraw that licensee’s plea of guilty and to enter a plea of not guilty, or dismissing the accusation or information.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), and with the recognition that
 sentencing may not occur for months or years following the entry of a guilty plea, the commissioner may suspend the license of a real estate licensee upon the entry by the licensee of a guilty plea to any of the crimes described in paragraph (1). If the guilty plea is withdrawn, the suspension shall be rescinded and the license reinstated to its status prior to the suspension. The department shall notify a person whose license is subject to suspension pursuant to this paragraph of that person’s right to have the issue of the suspension heard in accordance with Section 10100.

(c) Knowingly authorized, directed, connived at, or aided in the publication, advertisement, distribution, or circulation of a material false statement or representation concerning their designation or certification of special education, credential, trade organization membership,
 or business, or concerning a business opportunity or a land or subdivision, as defined in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 11000) of Part 2, offered for sale.

(d) Willfully disregarded or violated this part or Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 11000) of Part 2 or the rules and regulations of the commissioner for the administration and enforcement of this part and Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 11000) of Part 2.

(e) Willfully used the term “realtor” or a trade name or insignia of membership in a real estate organization of which the licensee is not a member.

(f) Acted or conducted themself in a manner that would have warranted the denial of their application for a real estate license,
 either had a license denied or had a license issued by another agency of this state, another state, or the federal government revoked, surrendered, or suspended, or received an order of debarment, for acts that, if done by a real estate licensee, would be grounds for the suspension or revocation of a California real estate license, if the action of denial, revocation, surrender, suspension, or debarment by the other agency or entity was taken only after giving the licensee or applicant fair notice of the charges, an opportunity for a hearing, and other due process protections comparable to the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340), Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 11370), and Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), and only upon an express finding of a violation of law by the agency
 or entity.

(g) Demonstrated negligence or incompetence in performing an act for which the officer, director, or person is required to hold a license.

(h) As a broker licensee, failed to exercise reasonable supervision over the activities of that licensee’s salespersons, or, as the officer designated by a corporate broker licensee, failed to exercise reasonable supervision and control of the activities of the corporation for which a real estate license is required.

(i) Used their employment by a governmental agency in a capacity giving access to records, other than public records, in a manner that violates the confidential nature of the records.

(j) Engaged in any other conduct, whether of the same or of a different character than specified in this section, that constitutes fraud or dishonest dealing.

(k) Violated any of the terms, conditions, restrictions, and limitations contained in an order granting a restricted license.
